Massachusetts, session 194th, H3841.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of Chapter 115 shall be amended by adding at the end the following:
Any increase in existing benefits provided to the veteran under this section shall not be
included in any calculation for public housing or any other public assistance program.
of 1